New York, session 2025-2026, S4183.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subsection (bbb) to read as follows: 3 (bbb) Blood donation credit. (1) Allowance of credit. A taxpayer who 4 donates blood four or more times in a year to a blood bank that has been 5 issued a valid permit as provided in section five hundred seventy-five 6 of the public health law shall be allowed a credit as hereinafter 7 provided, against the tax imposed by this article. The amount of the 8 credit shall be five hundred dollars. For the purposes of this 9 subsection, "blood bank" means a facility for the collection, process- 10 ing, storage and/or distribution of human blood, blood components or 11 blood derivatives. 12 (2) Application of credit. If the amount of the credit allowed under 13 this subsection for any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for 14 such year, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be 15 credited or refunded in accordance with the provisions of section six 16 hundred eighty-six of this article, provided, however, that no interest 17 shall be paid thereon. 18 (3) Proof of claim. The commissioner may require a qualified taxpayer 19 to furnish proof of their blood donations in support of the claim for 20 credit under this subsection. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 22 years beginning on and after January 1, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07791-01-5